New Jersey, session 222, A3754.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   Section 1 of P.L.1974, c.50 (C.46:8-27) is amended to read as follows: 1. [The term "landlord," as used in this act, shall mean the person or persons who own or purport to own, or exercise control of any building or project in which there is rented or offered for rent housing space for living or dwelling purposes under either a written or oral lease, provided that this definition shall not include owner-occupied two unit premises.  This definition shall include but not be limited to any multiple dwelling subject to the "Hotel and Multiple Dwelling Law," P.L.1967, c.76 (C.55:13A-1 et seq.). Whenever: the owner of an apartment in a horizontal property regime as defined in P.L.1963, c.168 (C.46:8A-1 et seq.), a unit owner of a unit in a condominium as defined in P.L.1969, c.257 (C.46:8B-1 et seq.), an owner of a unit in a fee simple community as defined in section 1 of P.L.1989, c.299 (C.40:67-23.2) or an owner in a cooperative entity as defined in section 3 of P.L.1987, c.381 (C.46:8D-3) leases an apartment or unit to a tenant, that owner shall be deemed the landlord for the purposes of filing the certificate of registration as required by section 2 of P.L.1974, c.50 (C.46:8-28).  Nothing in P.L.1974, c.50 shall be construed as requiring a council of co-owners of a horizontal property regime, a condominium association, an association managing the common or shared elements or interests in a fee simple community or a cooperative association to comply with the certificate of registration requirement unless the council or association is the owner or lessor of the apartment or unit.  Nothing in P.L.1974, c.50 shall be construed to require a cooperative corporation to comply with the certificate of registration requirement unless the corporation leases a unit to a person other than a proprietary shareholder of the cooperative.  The foregoing provisions notwithstanding, the council, association or cooperative corporation having jurisdiction over a "multiple dwelling," as defined in section 3 of P.L.1967, c.76 (C.55:13A-3), shall comply with the registration requirements of section 12 of P.L.1967, c.76 (C.55:13A-12) with respect to the multiple dwelling as a whole.  The term "project" as used in this act shall mean a group of buildings which are or are represented to be under common or substantially common ownership and which stand on a single parcel of land or parcels of land which are contiguous and which group of buildings is named, designated or advertised as a common entity.  The contiguity of such parcels shall not be adversely affected by public rights-of-way incidental to such buildings.] As used in P.L.1974, c.50 (C.46:8-27 et seq.): Landlord means an owner of a building or project, or a unit thereof, in which there are residential rental premises, including, but not limited to: a multiple dwelling; an apartment in a horizontal property regime as defined in section 2 of P.L.1963, c.168 (C.46:8A-1 et seq.); an owner of a dwelling unit in a condominium as defined in P.L.1969, c.257 (C.46:8B-1 et seq.); a dwelling unit in a fee simple community as defined in section 1 of P.L.1989, c.299 (40:67-23.2); a cooperative association as defined in section 3 of P.L.1987, c.381 (C.46:8D-3); or any other planned real estate development of a kind now existing or yet to be developed, but the term shall not include a cooperative corporation unless the corporation rents a dwelling unit to a person other than a proprietary shareholder of the cooperative.  Nothing in P.L.1974, c.50 (C.46:8-27 et seq.) shall be construed as creating an exemption to the registration requirements of section 12 of P.L.1967, c.76 (C.55:13A-12) with respect to any multiple dwelling as a whole. Mailing address means the street address, and if applicable, the dwelling unit or room number, of the home or actual place of business of the person or entity being registered.  A post office box may be included in addition to, but not in lieu of, a street address. Multiple dwelling shall have the same definition as set forth in subsection (k) of section 3 of P.L.1967, c.76 (C.55:13A-3). Owner means the person who holds record title to a building, project, or dwelling unit. Owner-occupied means personally and lawfully occupied as the primary residence of the owner or a member of the owners household if the owner has temporarily taken lodging elsewhere. Primary residence means the residence where the owner resides a majority of the time. Project means a group of buildings under common or substantially common ownership that stand on a single parcel or more than one contiguous parcel of land, and is named, designated or advertised as a common entity.  The contiguity of such parcels shall not be adversely affected by public rights-of-way incidental to such buildings. Temporarily means for a period lasting no more than 90 days when the owner either already maintains a primary residence or intends to establish a primary residence and does so within 90 days after taking lodging elsewhere. Unit of dwelling space or dwelling unit means a room or rooms, floor or floors of rooms, suite, or apartment, whether furnished or unfurnished, occupied or intended or designed to be occupied for sleeping or dwelling purposes by one person, including but not limited to the owner, or by one household, including but not limited to the household of the owner. (cf: P.L.2003, c.56, s.1) 2.    Section 2 of P.L.1974, c.50 (C.46:8-28) is amended to read as follows: 2.    Every landlord shall [, within 30 days following the effective date of this act, or at the time of the creation of the first tenancy in any newly constructed or reconstructed building, ] file a certificate of registration on the form prescribed by the Commissioner of Community Affairs, within seven days of becoming a landlord of a rental premises.  The certificate of registration shall be filed with the clerk of the municipality, or [with such other municipal official as is designated by the clerk] the clerks designee, in which the residential property is situated, in the case of a one-dwelling unit rental or a two-dwelling unit non-owner occupied premises, or with the Bureau of Housing Inspection in the Department of Community Affairs in the case of a multiple dwelling [as defined in section 3 of P.L.1976 the "Hotel and Multiple  Dwelling Law" (C.55:13A-3), a certificate of registration on forms prescribed  by the Commissioner of Community Affairs, which] .  The certificate of registration shall contain the following information: a.     The name [and] , mailing address [of the record owner or owners of the premises and the record owner or owners of the rental business if not the same persons.  In the case of a partnership the names of all general partners shall be provided] , email address, and telephone number of each owner of the rental premises and the rental business, if not the same persons; b.    If the [record] owner [is a corporation, the name and address of the registered agent and corporate officers of said corporation] of the rental premises or the rental business is: (1)  a general partnership or a limited liability partnership, the name and mailing address of the managing partner or agent who has the authority to act on behalf of the partnership; (2)  a corporation, the names and mailing addresses of the registered agent and corporate officers of the corporation; or (3)  a limited liability company, the names and mailing addresses of the managing members of the limited liability company; c.     If [the address of any record owner is not located in the county in which  the premises are located, the name and address of a person who resides in the  county in which the premises are located and is authorized to accept notices  from a tenant and to issue receipts therefor and to accept service of process  on behalf of the record owner] an owner is not located in the county in which the rental premises are located, the name, mailing address, email address, and telephone number of a person who resides in the county in which the rental premises are located and is authorized to accept notices from a tenant and to issue receipts therefor, and to accept service of process on behalf of the owner; d.    The name [and] , mailing address [of the managing agent of the premises, if any] , email address, and telephone number of the property manager or managing agent of the rental premises, if any; e.     The name [and] , mailing address, including the [dwelling unit, apartment or room number of the superintendent, janitor, custodian or other individual employed by the record owner or managing agent to provide regular maintenance service, if any] unit number, email address, and telephone number of the superintendent, janitor, custodian, or other individual employed by the owner or managing agent to provide regular maintenance service at the rental premises, if any; f.     The name, mailing address [and telephone number of a representative of the record owner or managing agent who may be reached or contacted at any time in the event of an emergency affecting the premises or any unit of dwelling space therein, including such emergencies as the failure of any essential service or system, and who has the authority to make emergency decisions concerning the building and any repair thereto or expenditure in connection therewith and shall, at all times, have access to a current list of building tenants that shall be made available to emergency personnel as required in the event of an emergency] , email address, and telephone number of an individual who: (1) has the authority to make emergency decisions concerning repairs or expenditures related to repairs to the rental premises; (2) may be reached at any time in the event of any emergency affecting the rental premises or any unit therein; and (3) shall, at all times, have access to a current list of tenants residing in the rental premises that shall be made available to emergency personnel as required in the event of an emergency; g.    The name and mailing address of the mortgage service provider, and every holder of a recorded mortgage on the rental premises, if known ; h.    If fuel oil is [used to heat the building and] provided by the landlord [furnishes the] to heat [in] the building, the name [and] , mailing address, and telephone number of the fuel oil dealer servicing the building and the grade of fuel oil used ; and i.     The date of preparation of the certificate of registration. (cf: P.L.2003, c.56, s.2) 3.    Section 3 of P.L.1981, c.442 (C.46:8-28.1) is amended to read as follows: 3.    [In the case of a filing under section 2 of P.L.1974, c.50 (C.46:8-28) with the municipal clerk, or with such other municipal official as is designated by the clerk, the clerk or designated official shall index and file the certificate and make it reasonably available for public inspection. In the case of a filing with the Bureau of Housing Inspection shall be accompanied by the filing fee required pursuant to section 12 of P.L.1967, c.76 (C.55:13A-12).  The bureau shall review the certificate and, if it is found to be in conformity with this law and any regulations promulgated hereunder, validate the certificate and issue a validated copy to the landlord and a validated copy to the clerk of the municipality in which the building or project is located.  The clerk shall index the validated certificates, or forward them to the designated official for indexing, and the certificates shall be made available as with the certificates required of one and two dwelling unit nonowner occupied premises]  a.  All certificates of registration filed with the Bureau of Housing Inspection shall be reviewed, and if determined to be in compliance with the certificate of registration requirements set forth in P.L.1974, c.50 (C.46:8-27 et seq.) and any regulation promulgated thereunder, validated by the bureau.  The bureau then shall issue a copy of the validated certificate of registration to the record owner, or the person who filed the original, if different than the record owner, and to the clerk of the municipality in which the building or project is located. b.    All certificates of registration filed with the clerk of a municipality and all validated certificates of registration issued to the clerk by the bureau shall be indexed and recorded by the clerk and made reasonably available for public inspection. The clerk may disclose to any person making inquiry whether a validated certificate of registration has been filed for any designated property. (cf: P.L.2001, c.264, s.2) 4.    Section 4 of P.L.1981, c.442 (C.46:8-28.2) is amended to read as follows: 4.  Every landlord required to file a certificate of registration as described in section 2 of P.L.1974, c.50 (C.46:8-28) shall file an amended certificate of registration within [20] 10 business days after any change in the information required to be included thereon.  [No] A fee shall not be required for the filing of an amendment except where the ownership of the premises is changed.  The amended certificate of registration shall contain the date of its preparation. (cf: P.L.1981, c.442, s.4) 5.    Section 8 of P.L.1981, c.442 (C.46:8-28.3) is amended to read as follows: 8.    [Nothing herein shall require a] A landlord who has [heretofore] complied with [all] the provisions of P.L.1974, c.50 (C.46:8-27 et seq.) or the "Hotel and Multiple Dwelling [Law" (P.L.1967, c.76, C.55:13A-1 et seq.)] Law," P.L.1967, c.75 (C.55:13A-1 et seq.), or both, [applicable to any building or project to register the building or project again pursuant to this amendatory and supplementary act.  Whenever, after the effective date of this amendatory and supplementary act, any owner or landlord shall be required to file an amended certificate of registration pursuant to the provisions of this amendatory and supplementary act, the "Hotel and Multiple Dwelling Law," or P.L.1974, c.50, then that filing shall be in accordance with this  amendatory and supplementary act] shall not be required to register the building or project again pursuant to P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  On and after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), a landlord who is required to file an amended certificate of registration shall do so in accordance with the provisions set forth in section 4 of P.L.1981, c.442 (C.46:8-28.2). (cf: P.L.1981, c.442, s.8) 6.    Section 3 of P.L.1974, c.50 (C.46:8-29) is amended to read as follows: 3.    [Within 30 days following the effective date hereof, and at the time] a.  Unless a tenancy is governed by a written lease that includes or attaches, in a prominent manner, the information that is required by section 2 of P.L.1974, c.50 (C.46:8-28) to be contained in the certificate of registration, within seven days of the creation of a new tenancy, [every] a landlord shall provide each [occupant or] tenant [in his building or project] with a copy of the certificate of registration required by section 2 of [this act] P.L.1974, c.50 (C.46:8-28).  [If] b.    In the case of an amended certificate [is] filed in accordance with section 4 of P.L.1981, c.442 (C.46:8-28.2), the landlord shall furnish each [occupant or] tenant with a copy of the amended certificate within seven days after the amended certificate is filed with the municipal clerk, or with such other municipal official as is designated by the clerk, in the case of a tenant occupied one family dwelling or a non-owner occupied two family dwelling and within seven days of receipt of a validated certificate from the Bureau of Housing Inspection in the case of a [building or project] multiple dwelling subject to the "Hotel and Multiple Dwelling Law," P.L.1967, c.76 (C.55:13A-1 et seq.). c.  (1)  In the case of a tenant-occupied one family dwelling or a non-owner occupied two family dwelling, a landlord shall post a copy of the current filed or validated certificate of registration in one or more locations at the rental premises so that the statement is prominent and accessible to all tenants and public officials. (2)  In the case of a tenant-occupied multiple dwelling, a landlord shall post in a least one conspicuous area, where the information is most likely to be viewed by tenants, and on the Internet website of any management company that manages a tenant-occupied multiple dwelling: (a)   emergency contact instructions and the name, mailing address, email address, and telephone number of the individual who may be reached or contacted at any time in the event of an emergency affecting the rental premises or any unit of dwelling space, in accordance with the landlord registration requirements set forth in subsection f. of section 2 of P.L.1974, c.50 (C.46:8-28); and (b)   instructions on how to access the comprehensive social services information toll-free telephone hotline service, established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1991, c.524 (C.30:1-1.1). d.  The following information shall be contained in a printed notice, conspicuously set forth in prominent boldface type, in every lease offered to a tenant in a multiple dwelling: (1)  the Internet website address of the management company that manages the multiple dwelling, if any; and (2)   instructions on how to access the comprehensive social services information toll-free telephone hotline service, established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1991, c.524 (C.30:1-1.1). e.     The information provided to tenants in accordance with subsection a., b., c., and d. of this section shall be made available in English and Spanish. (cf: P.L.2001, c.264, s.3) 7.   Section 5 of P.L.1974, c.50 (C.46:8-31) is amended to read as follows: 5. In any action in the Superior Court, Law Division, Special Civil Part or municipal court by an occupant or tenant or to recover penalties against a landlord who has not complied with [this act] P.L.1974, c.50 (C.46:8-27 et seq.) and who cannot be served within the county or municipality, the summons and complaint may be served by certified and regular mail upon the record owner at the last address listed in the tax records of either the municipality or county , or, if the owner has not changed since the last certificate of registration filing or validation, at the mailing address listed in the most current or validated certification of registration.  If the owner is a limited liability company or a corporation, the summons and complaint may be served by certified and regular mail upon the company or corporations registered agent.  Service [of such summons and complaint by certified and regular mail shall be effective to bring] in accordance with this section shall be deemed proper service on the landlord [before the Superior Court, Law Division, Special Civil Part or municipal court] even if [it were] the landlord is not served within the county or municipality in which the court issuing the summons is located. (cf: P.L.1991, c.91, s.455) 8.    Section 6 of P.L.1974, c.50 (C.46:8-32) is amended to read as follows: 6.    [Service]  If service of process, as provided in section 5 P.L.1974, c.50 (46:8-31), cannot be made, service of process on the clerk of the Superior Court, Law Division, Special Civil Part or municipal court having jurisdiction over the municipality in which the property is located shall be deemed service on the landlord upon submission to the court of the following: a.     [A certification of the tenant stating that he] The tenants certification that the tenant does not know the landlord's whereabouts after having made a diligent effort, satisfactory to the court, to determine the same; and b.    Proof of failure of service by certified mail as provided in section 5 [of this act] of P.L.1974, c.50 (46:8-31). (cf: P.L.1991, c.91, s.456) 9.    Section 7 of P.L.1974, c.50 (C.46:8-33) is amended to read as follows: 7.    [In any action for possession instituted by a landlord who has failed to comply with the provisions of this act, no judgment for possession shall be entered until there has been compliance.  The court shall continue such case for up to 90  days and if there has not been compliance within such period, the action shall be dismissed] A judgment of possession shall not be entered in favor of a landlord who has failed to comply with sections 2 and 3 of P.L.1974, c.50 (C.46:8-28 et seq.). The court shall defer the entry of a judgment for possession for up to 60 days, at which time the action shall be dismissed unless the landlord submits to the court proof of the certificate of registration and service thereof on the tenant, within 30 days. (cf: P.L.1974, c.50, s.7) 10.  Section 9 of P.L.1974, c.50 (C.46:8-35) is amended to read as follows: 9.    [Any] A landlord who [shall violate] violates any provision of P.L.1974, c.50 (C.46:8-27 et seq.) or sections 3, 4, and 8 of P.L.1981, c.442 (C.46:8-28.1 through C.46-8-28.3) shall be liable [to] for a penalty of not more than [$500.00 for each] $100 for a first offense, $500 for a second offense, and $1,000 for a third or subsequent offense, recoverable by a summary proceeding under ["the penalty enforcement law" (N.J.S.2A:58-1 et seq.)] the "Penalty Enforcement Law of 1999," P.L.1999, c.274 (C.2A:58-10 et seq.).  The Superior Court, Law Division, Special Civil Part in the county or the municipal court of the municipality in which the premises are located shall have jurisdiction to enforce [said] the penalty. The Attorney General, the municipality in which the premises are located, or any other person may institute the proceeding; where the municipality or any other person other than the Attorney General institutes the proceeding, a recovered penalty should be remitted by the court to the municipality in which the premises subject to the proceeding are located. (cf: P.L.1991, c.91, s.458) 11.  Section 16 of P.L.1967, c.76 (C.55:13A-16) is amended to read as follows: 16.  (a)  If the commissioner shall discover any violation of the provisions of this act or any rules and regulations promulgated thereunder upon any inspection of any hotel or multiple dwelling, then the commissioner shall issue and cause to be served on the owner thereof a written order requiring said  owner to terminate, or cause to be terminated, any such violation.  Such written order shall state the nature of any such violation and a reasonable specified time within which any such violation must be terminated.  Such written order shall also require and direct the owner to whom it is issued to take, or cause to be taken, such affirmative action as may be necessary to correct any such violation. (b)  The commissioner may petition the Superior Court of this State for mandatory injunctive relief enforcing any order issued by the commissioner pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.  In any such proceeding the Superior Court may proceed in a summary manner or otherwise, and shall have power to grant such temporary relief or restraining order as it may deem just and proper, and to make and enter a decree enforcing, modifying, and enforcing as so modified, or setting aside in whole or in part any order issued by the commissioner pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. (c)  If a significant violation is discovered upon an inspection or reinspection: (1)  the commissioner shall serve written notice upon the owner within 48 hours of completing the inspection that identifies a significant violation; and (2)  the written notice shall identify all such violations and the time period that the owner shall be afforded to correct the violations. (d)  If an application for a hearing is filed pursuant to section 18 of P.L.1967, c.76 (C.55:13A-18) for a significant violation as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the hearing shall be held within no more than 30 days and a final decision shall be rendered by the commissioner within 60 days from the date of the hearing. (e)  For the purposes of this section, significant violation means conditions that are a threat to the health or safety of the tenants, which remain unaddressed, including but not limited to: failure to provide heat, running water, or adequate sewage disposal facilities; structural deficiency; or an infestation of rats, mice, roaches, termites, or other vermin. (cf: P.L.1967, c.76, s.16) 12.  (New section)  The information to be provided to tenants, as set forth in subsection c. of section 3 of P.L.1974, c.50 (C.46:8-29) shall be posted in each multiple dwelling in the manner provided in that subsection. 13.  (New section)  If a tenant successfully defends against eviction by asserting a breach of the implied warranty of habitability, the court shall make such a finding on the record and mark the case as Dismissed for Reasons Concerning Habitability in any record disclosed to the public. 14.  (New section) Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a municipality may satisfy up to ten percent of its obligation to provide a fair share of the region's present and prospective need for affordable housing by establishing a program encouraging the rehabilitation of substandard dwelling units and the dedication of rehabilitated units for rental as low income housing for periods of at least 30 years.  A municipality may accept funds from any source, including a municipal affordable housing trust fund, the "New Jersey Affordable Housing Trust Fund," established pursuant to section 20 of P.L.1985, c.222 (C.52:27D-320), any other State entity, and the federal government, for the purpose of awarding or granting payments to property owners as incentives for the rehabilitation of substandard dwelling units and the dedication of those units for rental as low income housing for periods of at least 30 years. 15.  The following sections are repealed: Section 4 of P.L 1974, c.50 (C.46:8-30); and Section 1 of P.L.1974, c.48 (C.46:8-38). 16.  This act shall take effect on first day of the seventh month next following the date of enactment, except that the Commissioner of Community Affairs may take any anticipatory action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.